Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 2
BAIL AFTER CONVICTION

16-4-201. Bail after conviction.

After conviction, either before or after sentencing, the defendant may orally, or in writing, move for release on bail pending determination of a motion for a new trial or motion in arrest of judgment or during any stay of execution or pending review by an appellate court, and, except in cases where the defendant has been convicted of a capital offense, the trial court, in its discretion, may continue the bond given for pretrial release, or may release the defendant on bond with additional conditions including monetary conditions, or require bond under one or more of the alternatives set forth in section 16-4-104.

The district attorney must be present at the time the court passes on a defendant's motion for release on bail after conviction.

Bond shall not be continued in effect following a plea of guilty or of nolo contendere or following conviction unless the written consents of the sureties, if any, are filed with the court. In the initial bond documents filed with the court, a surety shall indicate, in writing and at the time of the posting of bond, if the surety consents to the continuance of the bond through sentencing of the defendant. If the surety does not provide written consent at the time of the initial posting of bond, the surety may provide written consent at the time of the plea of guilty or nolo contendere or within a reasonable time thereafter as determined by the court. A court shall not require the posting of any form of bond that allows for the continuance of said bond after a plea of guilty or of nolo contendere or following conviction without filing with the court the written consents of the sureties, if any.

For a defendant who has been convicted of a felony offense, a condition of bail bond shall be that the court shall require the defendant to execute or subscribe a written prior waiver of extradition stating that the defendant consents to extradition to this state and waives all formal procedures incidental to extradition proceedings in the event that he or she is arrested in another state while released on such bail bond and acknowledging that he or she shall not be admitted to bail in any other state pending extradition to this state.

After conviction, a defendant who is granted probation pursuant to section 18-1.3-202, C.R.S., may orally, or in writing, move for a stay of probation pending determination of a motion for a new trial or a motion in arrest of judgment or pending review by an appellate court. The trial court, in its discretion, may grant a stay of probation and require the defendant to post an appeal bond under one or more of the alternatives set forth in section 16-4-104. The district attorney shall be present at the time the court passes on a defendant's motion for stay of probation after conviction.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 209, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-4-201.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 621, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 97, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1490, § 131, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 341, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1393, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 839, § 3, effective May 11.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-4-201.5. Right to bail after a conviction - exceptions.

The court may grant bail after a person is convicted, pending sentencing or appeal, only as provided by this part 2; except that no bail is allowed for persons convicted of:

Murder;

Any felony sexual assault involving the use of a deadly weapon;

Any felony sexual assault committed against a child who is under fifteen years of age;

A crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S.;

Any felony during the commission of which the person used a firearm;

A crime of possession of a weapon by a previous offender, as described in section 18-12-108 (2)(b), (2)(c), (4)(b), (4)(c), or (5);

Child abuse, as described in section 18-6-401 (7)(a)(I), C.R.S.;

A class 5 felony act of domestic violence, as described in section 18-6-801 (7);

A second or subsequent offense for stalking that occurs within seven years after the date of a prior offense for which the person was convicted, as described in section 18-3-602 (3)(b); or

Stalking when there was a temporary or permanent protection order, injunction, or condition of bond, probation, or parole or any other court order in effect that protected the victim from the person, including but not limited to stalking, as described in section 18-3-602 (5).

The court shall not set bail that is otherwise allowed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section unless the court finds that:

The person is unlikely to flee and does not pose a danger to the safety of any person or the community; and

The appeal is not frivolous or is not pursued for the purpose of delay.

The provisions of this section shall apply to offenses committed on or after January 1, 1995.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 57, § 8, effective March 15.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 635, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1490, § 132, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(e) and (1)(f) amended and (1)(g) added, p. 1686, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(f) amended and (1)(h), (1)(i), and (1)(j) added, (HB 17-1150), ch. 182, p. 665, § 1, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1)(d), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-4-202. Appeal bond hearing - factors to be considered.

The court shall consider the following factors in deciding whether or not an appeal bond should be granted and determining the type of bond and conditions of release required:

The nature and circumstances of the offense before the court and the sentence imposed for that offense;

The defendant's length of residence in the community;

The defendant's employment, family ties, character, reputation, and mental condition;

The defendant's past criminal record and record of appearance at court proceedings;

Any showing of intimidation or harassment of witnesses or potential witnesses, or likelihood that the defendant will harm or threaten any person having a part in the trial resulting in conviction;

Any other criminal charges pending against the defendant and the potential sentences should the defendant be convicted of those charges;

The circumstances of, and sentences imposed in, any criminal case in which the defendant has been convicted but execution stayed pending appeal;

The likelihood that the defendant will commit additional criminal offenses during the pendency of such defendant's appeal; and

The defendant's likelihood of success on appeal.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 209, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-4-202.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1726, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

IP(1) amended, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 840, § 4, effective May 11.

16-4-203. Appeal bond hearing - order.

After considering the factors set forth in section 16-4-202, the court may enter one of the following orders:

Deny the defendant appeal bond; or

Repealed.

Grant the defendant appeal bond.

If the court determines that an appeal bond should be granted, the court shall set the amount of bail and order either:

An appeal bond in the amount of the bail to be executed and secured by depositing cash or property as provided by statute or by an approved surety or sureties; or

An appeal bond in the amount of the bail to be executed on the personal recognizance of the defendant.

(2.5) If the court determines that an appeal bond should be granted, the court shall provide as an explicit condition of the appeal bond that the defendant not harass, molest, intimidate, retaliate against, or tamper with the victim of or any prosecution witnesses to the crime, unless the court makes written findings that such condition is not necessary.

In addition to the above, the court may:

Place the defendant in the custody of the probation department or a designated person who agrees to supervise him;

Place restrictions on the travel, activities, associations, or place of abode of the defendant during the pendency of the appeal;

Impose any other condition deemed necessary to assure defendant's appearance as required.

Upon written motion of the state or the defendant, the sentencing court may increase or reduce the amount of appeal bond, alter the security for or conditions of the appeal bond, or revoke the appeal bond. Notice of hearing on the motion shall be given in the manner provided in section 16-4-107.

If the defendant has been charged with committing another felony, level 1 drug misdemeanor, or class 1 misdemeanor while he or she is at liberty on an appeal bond, and probable cause has been found with respect to such other felony, level 1 drug misdemeanor, or class 1 misdemeanor or the defendant has waived his or her right to a probable cause determination as to the felony, level 1 drug misdemeanor, or class 1 misdemeanor, the court shall revoke his or her appeal bond on motion of the attorney general or district attorney.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 210, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-4-203.

L. 82:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(b) repealed, p. 307, §§ 1, 2, effective March 17.

L. 94:

(2.5) added, p. 2022, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2013:

(5) amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1928, § 37, effective October 1.

16-4-204. Appellate review of terms and conditions of bail or appeal bond.

After entry of an order pursuant to section 16-4-109 or 16-4-201, the defendant or the state may seek review of said order by filing a petition for review in the appellate court. If an order has been entered pursuant to section 16-4-104, 16-4-109, or 16-4-201, the petition shall be the exclusive method of appellate review.

The petition shall be in writing, shall be served as provided by court rule for service of motions, and shall have appended thereto a transcript of the hearing held pursuant to section 16-4-109 or 16-4-203. The opposing party may file a response thereto within seven days or as provided by court rule.

After review, the appellate court may:

Remand the petition for further hearing if it determines that the record does not disclose the findings upon which the court entered the order; or

Order the trial court to modify the terms and conditions of bail or appeal bond; or

Order the trial court to modify the terms and conditions of bail or appeal bond and remand for further hearing on additional conditions of bail or appeal bond; or

Dismiss the petition.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to deny any party the rights secured by section 21 of article II of the Colorado constitution.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 211, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-4-204.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 848, § 69, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 759, § 26, effective June 6.

16-4-205. When appellate court may fix appeal bond.

If a trial court fails or refuses to grant or deny an appeal bond within forty-eight hours following application for such bond, the defendant may move the appellate court for such an order, and that court shall promptly hear and rule upon the motion.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 211, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-4-205.

16-4-206. Notification of court reminder program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-036), ch. 293, p. 2687, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (SB 22-018), ch. 191, p. 1273, § 4, effective July 15.